Maryland, session 2025, HB0007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–707.
(a) [Unless] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C–1) OF THIS SECTION,
AND UNLESS otherwise directed by a police officer or traffic control signal, the driver of a
vehicle approaching a stop sign at an intersection shall stop at the near side of the
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0007*

HOUSE BILL 7
intersection at a clearly marked stop line.
(b) [Unless] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C–1) OF THIS SECTION,
AND UNLESS otherwise directed by a police officer or traffic control signal, the driver of a
vehicle approaching a stop sign at an intersection shall stop at the near side of the
intersection and, if there is no clearly marked stop line, before entering any crosswalk.
(c) [Unless] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C–1) OF THIS SECTION,
AND UNLESS otherwise directed by a police officer or traffic control signal, the driver of a
vehicle approaching a stop sign at an intersection shall stop at the near side of an
intersection and, if there is no crosswalk, at the nearest point before entering the
intersection that gives the driver a view of traffic approaching on the intersecting roadway.
(C–1) WHEN APPROACHING A STOP SIGN AT AN INTERSECTION WITH A
HIGHWAY WITH TWO OR FEWER LANES FOR MOVING TRAFFIC, A PERSON OPERATING
A BICYCLE MAY CAUTIOUSLY MAKE A TURN OR PROCEED THROUGH THE
INTERSECTION WITHOUT STOPPING IF THE PERSON OPERATING THE BICYCLE:
(1) REDUCES THE SPEED OF THE BICYCLE TO A REASONABLE RATE;
AND
(2) YIELDS THE RIGHT–OF–WAY TO:
(I) ANY VEHICLE IN THE INTERSECTION; AND
(II) ANY APPROACHING VEHICLE ON ANOTHER HIGHWAY THAT
IS NEAR ENOUGH TO THE INTERSECTION THAT IT POSES AN IMMEDIATE DANGER.
(d) The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign at an intersection, if required
for safety to stop, shall stop at the near side of the intersection at a clearly marked stop
line.
(e) The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign at an intersection, if required
for safety to stop, shall stop at the near side of the intersection and, if there is no clearly
marked stop line, before entering any crosswalk.
(f) The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign at an intersection, if required
for safety to stop, shall stop at the near side of the intersection and, if there is no crosswalk,
at the nearest point before entering the intersection that gives the driver a view of traffic
approaching on the intersecting roadway.
21–1202.
(a) Every person operating a bicycle or a motor scooter in a public bicycle area
has all the rights granted to and is subject to all the duties required of the driver of a vehicle

HOUSE BILL 7 3
by this title, including the duties set forth in § 21–504 of this title, except:
(1) As otherwise provided in this subtitle; and
(2) For those provisions of this title that by their very nature cannot apply.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a person has the
rights and is subject to the restrictions applicable to pedestrians under this title while the
person is lawfully operating a bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle:
(i) On a sidewalk or sidewalk area; or
(ii) In or through a crosswalk.
(2) At an intersection, a person operating a bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle
is subject to all traffic control signals, as provided in §§ 21–202 and 21–203 of this title.
(3) Section 21–506 of this title does not apply to a person operating a
bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING § 21–707(A) THROUGH (C) OF THIS TITLE, WHEN
APPROACHING A STOP SIGN AT AN INTERSECTION WITH A HIGHWAY WITH TWO OR
FEWER LANES FOR MOVING TRAFFIC, A PERSON OPERATING A BICYCLE MAY
CAUTIOUSLY MAKE A TURN OR PROCEED THROUGH THE INTERSECTION WITHOUT
STOPPING IF THE PERSON OPERATING THE BICYCLE:
(1) REDUCES THE SPEED OF THE BICYCLE TO A REASONABLE RATE;
AND
(2) YIELDS THE RIGHT–OF–WAY TO:
(I) ANY VEHICLE IN THE INTERSECTION; AND
(II) ANY APPROACHING VEHICLE ON ANOTHER HIGHWAY THAT
IS NEAR ENOUGH TO THE INTERSECTION THAT IT POSES AN IMMEDIATE DANGER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.